fr: Type de repose-pieds du bâton sauteur: Repose-pieds fixes; Repose-pieds pliables; Plateformes antidérapantes pour les pieds; Repose-pieds rotatifs; Plateformes larges pour les pieds; Autre
bg-BG: Тип степенка на пого стик: Фиксирани стъпенки; Сгъваеми стъпенки; Неплъзгащи се платформи за крака; Въртящи се стъпенки; Широки платформи за крака; Други
th: ที่วางเท้าแบบไม้กระโดด: ที่พักเท้าแบบยึดตายตัว; ที่พักเท้าแบบพับได้; แท่นเหยียบกันลื่น; ที่พักเท้าแบบหมุนได้; แท่นเหยียบแบบกว้าง; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип подножек пого-стика: Фиксированные подножки; Складные подножки; Нескользящие платформы для ног; Вращающиеся подножки; Широкие платформы для ног; Другое
en: Pogo stick footrest type: Fixed foot pegs; Folding foot pegs; Non-slip foot platforms; Rotating foot pegs; Wide foot platforms; Other
pt-PT: apoio para os pés tipo pula-pula: Pousa-pés fixos; Pousa-pés dobráveis; Plataformas para os pés antiderrapantes; Pousa-pés rotativos; Plataformas para os pés largas; Outro
hr-HR: Oslonac za noge tipa Pogo stick: Fiksni oslonci za stopala; Sklopivi oslonci za stopala; Protuklizne platforme za stopala; Rotirajući oslonci za stopala; Široke platforme za stopala; Ostalo
vi: kiểu gác chân dạng gậy nhún: Chốt để chân cố định; Chốt để chân gập; Bục để chân chống trượt; Chốt để chân xoay; Bục để chân rộng; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de suport pentru picioare al pogo stick-ului: Suporturi fixe pentru picioare; Suporturi pliabile pentru picioare; Platforme antiderapante pentru picioare; Suporturi rotative pentru picioare; Platforme late pentru picioare; Altele
cs: Typ podnožky Pogo stick: Pevné stupačky; Sklopné stupačky; Protiskluzové nášlapy; Otočné stupačky; Široké nášlapy; Jiné
nb: Fotstøttetype på pogostav: Faste fotpinner; Sammenleggbare fotpinner; Sklisikre fotplattformer; Roterende fotpinner; Brede fotplattformer; Annet
tr: Pogo çubuğu tipi ayak dayama yeri: Sabit ayaklıklar; Katlanabilir ayaklıklar; Kaymaz ayak platformları; Dönen ayaklıklar; Geniş ayak platformları; Diğer
zh-TW: 彈跳桿腳踏類型: 固定腳踏釘; 折疊腳踏釘; 防滑腳踏板; 旋轉腳踏釘; 寬腳踏板; 其他
ko: 포고 스틱 발받침대 유형: 고정식 발 받침대; 접이식 발 받침대; 미끄럼 방지 발판; 회전식 발 받침대; 와이드 발판; 기타
el: Τύπος υποπόδιου του παιχνιδιού άλματος με ελατήριο: Σταθερά μαρσπιέ; Πτυσσόμενα μαρσπιέ; Αντιολισθητικές πλατφόρμες ποδιών; Περιστρεφόμενα μαρσπιέ; Φαρδιές πλατφόρμες ποδιών; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta opore za noge na pogo palici: Fiksne stopalke; Zložljive stopalke; Nedrseče platforme za noge; Vrtljive stopalke; Široke platforme za noge; Drugo
sv: Typ av fotstöd för pogo stick: Fasta fotsteg; Uppfällbara fotsteg; Halkfria fotplattor; Roterande fotsteg; Breda fotplattor; Övrigt
it: Tipo di poggiapiedi del trampolo a molla: Poggiapiedi fissi; Poggiapiedi pieghevoli; Pedane antiscivolo; Poggiapiedi rotanti; Pedane larghe; Altro
nl: Pogo stick voetsteuntype: Vaste voetsteunen; Opklapbare voetsteunen; Antislip voetplatforms; Draaiende voetsteunen; Brede voetplatforms; Overig
hu: Ugrálórúd lábtámaszának típusa: Rögzített lábtartók; Felhajtható lábtartók; Csúszásmentes lábtartó platformok; Forgó lábtartók; Széles lábtartó platformok; Egyéb
da: Fodstøtte af typen kængurustylte: Faste fodstøtter; Foldbare fodstøtter; Skridsikre fodplatforme; Roterende fodstøtter; Brede fodplatforme; Andet
pt-BR: Pula-pula tipo de apoio para os pés: Pinos fixos para os pés; Pinos dobráveis para os pés; Plataformas antiderrapantes para os pés; Pinos rotativos para os pés; Plataformas largas para os pés; Outro
lt-LT: Pogo lazdos pakojo tipas: Fiksuotos atramos kojoms; Atlenkiamos atramos kojoms; Neslystančios pėdų platformos; Besisukančios atramos kojoms; Plačios pėdų platformos; Kita
zh-CN: 弹跳杆脚踏类型: 固定脚踏钉; 折叠脚踏钉; 防滑脚踏平台; 旋转脚踏钉; 加宽脚踏平台; 其他
es: Tipo reposapiés de estilo palo saltarín: Estribos fijos; Estribos plegables; Plataformas antideslizantes para los pies; Estribos giratorios; Plataformas anchas para los pies; Otro
fi: Hyppykepin jalkatason tyyppi: Kiinteät jalkatapit; Taittuvat jalkatapit; Liukumattomat astinlaudat; Pyörivät jalkatapit; Leveät astinlaudat; Muu
ja: ホッピング用フットレストタイプ: 固定フットペグ; 折りたたみ式フットペグ; 滑り止めフットプラットフォーム; 回転式フットペグ; ワイドフットプラットフォーム; その他
pl: Typ podnóżka pogo sticka: Stałe stopki; Składane stopki; Antypoślizgowe platformy na stopy; Obrotowe stopki; Szerokie platformy na stopy; Inne
de: Art der Fußstütze des Pogo-Sticks: Feste Fußrasten; Klappbare Fußrasten; Rutschfeste Fußplattformen; Drehbare Fußrasten; Breite Fußplattformen; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ opierky na nohy skákacej tyče Pogo: Pevné stúpačky; Sklopné stúpačky; Protišmykové plošiny; Otočné stúpačky; Široké plošiny; Iné